Maine, session 132, LD726.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 25 MRSA §2808, sub-§3, as amended by PL 2023, c. 242, §1, is further
amended to read:
3. Reimbursement Liability for training costs. Whenever a full-time law
enforcement officer, trained at the Maine Criminal Justice Academy or the Indian police
academy at the federal law enforcement training center at the expense of a particular
governmental entity, is subsequently hired by another governmental entity as a full-time
law enforcement officer within 5 years of graduation from the academy, the governmental
entity shall reimburse is liable to the first governmental entity for the training costs
according to the following formula, unless a mutual agreement is reached.
A. If the officer is hired by the other governmental entity during the first year after
graduation, that governmental entity shall reimburse pay the first governmental entity
the full cost of twice the training costs.
B. If the officer is hired by the other governmental entity during the 2nd year after
graduation, that governmental entity shall reimburse pay the first governmental entity
80% 160% of the training costs.
C. If the officer is hired by the other governmental entity during the 3rd year after
graduation, that governmental entity shall reimburse pay the first governmental entity
60% 120% of the training costs.
D. If the officer is hired by the other governmental entity during the 4th year after
graduation, that governmental entity shall reimburse the first governmental entity 40%
80% of the training costs.
E. If the officer is hired by the other governmental entity during the 5th year after
graduation, that governmental entity shall reimburse the first governmental entity 20%
40% of the training costs.
F. If the officer graduated more than 5 years before subsequently being hired by the
other governmental entity, that governmental entity is not obligated to reimburse the
first governmental entity.
If the officer is subsequently hired by additional governmental entities within 5 years of
graduation from the academy, each of those governmental entities is liable to the
governmental employer immediately preceding it for the training costs paid by that
governmental entity under this subsection. The extent of financial liability must be
determined according to the formula established by this subsection.
The board shall, as necessary, incorporate the Indian police academy at the federal law
enforcement training center into its basic law enforcement training program reimbursement
rates.